Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 20, section 2, subdivision 30, is amended to read: Subd. 30. Grant Programs; Child Mental Health Grants 44,487,000 37,934,000 (a) Psychiatric residential treatment facility start-up grants. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 and deleted text begin $1,000,000deleted text end new text begin $800,000new text end in fiscal year 2025 are for psychiatric residential treatment facility start-up grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0941, subdivision 5. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (b) African American Child Wellness Institute. $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is for a grant to the African American Child Wellness Institute to provide culturally specific mental health and substance use disorder services under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.0961. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (c) Base level adjustment. The general fund base is $34,648,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $34,648,000 in fiscal year 2027. Sec. 2. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES; CLAY COUNTY PSYCHIATRIC RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT FACILITY PER DIEM RATE.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any statutory requirements to the contrary under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0941, subdivision 3, when establishing the provider-specific per diem rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0941, subdivision 3, for the Clay County psychiatric residential treatment facility, the commissioner of human services must establish the rate in an amount equal to or greater than $1,800 per diem. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CLAY COUNTY PSYCHIATRIC RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT FACILITY.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Clay County for costs related to the purchase of equipment and final redesign and remodeling for the conversion of the West Central Regional Juvenile Center nonsecure unit into an 18-bed psychiatric residential treatment facility for persons younger than 21 years of age, pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0941. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; PSYCHIATRIC RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT START-UP AND CAPACITY-BUILDING GRANTS.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for psychiatric residential treatment facility start-up and capacity-building grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0941, subdivision 5. Of these amounts, $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for a grant award to Clay County for eligible grant activities related to a new 18-bed psychiatric residential treatment facility in the county. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end